test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-suyl_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - suâl a-stem saari: # Noun - full paradigm
     suâl+N+Sg+Nom: suâl
     suâl+N+Sg+Gen: suõllu
     suâl+N+Sg+Acc: suõllu
     suâl+N+Sg+Ill: [suâllǥa, suâllʼja]
     suâl+N+Sg+Loc: [suõllust, suâllʼjest]
     suâl+N+Sg+Com: [suõlluin, suâllʼjin]
     suâl+N+Ess: suâlan
     suâl+N+Par: suõllud
     suâl+N+Sg+Abe: [suõllutaa, suõllutää]
     suâl+N+Pl+Nom: suõllu
     suâl+N+Pl+Gen: suõllui
     suâl+N+Pl+Acc: suõlluid
     suâl+N+Pl+Ill: suõlluid
     suâl+N+Pl+Loc: suõlluin
     suâl+N+Pl+Com: suõlluivuiʹm
     suâl+N+Pl+Abe: [suõlluitaa, suõlluitää]
